Massachusetts, session 194th, H631.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
6 sections:- 
Section 37. For the purposes of sections 38 through 42, inclusive, the following terms 
shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:- 
“Career technical education”, shall have the same meaning as vocational-technical 
education pursuant to section 1 of chapter 74. 
“Office”, shall mean the office of career technical education. 

of 5 8  Section 38.  There shall be established within the department of elementary and 
secondary education an office of career technical education, which shall be under the supervision 
and management of the  deputy commissioner of career technical education. The deputy 
commissioner shall be appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, 
with the approval of the board. It shall be the duty of said deputy commissioner to improve and 
maximize career technical education throughout the commonwealth, and to collaborate with the 
board to promulgate regulations and develop and implement polices to enhance the 
commonwealth’s career technical education programs, including but not limited to the ensuring 
the enforcement of regulations relative to certificates of occupational proficiency. 
Section 39. The office shall promote and support with available resources innovative and 
collaborative career technical education demonstration programs in which students split time 
between their comprehensive high school and a school offering programs under chapter 74; 
provided, that under such programs, participating students’ daily schedule shall include required 
academic classes and vocational courses when the equipment is available.  
Section 40. (a) The office shall develop credentials for students graduating from high 
quality career technical education programs in applied knowledge, effective relationships, and 
workplace skills as described in the federal Employability Skills Framework. 
(b) The office shall ensure instructional ability and competence of career technical 
education instructors through the utilization of occupational advisory boards and nationally 
validated teacher competency testing.  
(c)The office shall utilize both pre- and post-technical assessment in both cognitive and 
psychomotor domains to determine what students know and are able to do.  

of 5 30  (d) The office shall collaborate with recognized industry credential providers such as a 
recognized industry credential provider to develop state-customized credentials to measure 
career readiness through skill assessments appropriate to each tier of career technical education. 
(e) The office shall consider the use of the 21st Century Skills for Workplace Success 
Credential, including but not limited for use in validation of basic competencies prior to 
participation in externships or school-based enterprises and as a graduation or completion 
requirement for post-graduate and postsecondary chapter 74 programs. 
(f) The office shall support the use of Industry Recognized Credentials, known as IRCs, 
in chapter 74 programs. 
(g) The office shall support the use of both longitudinal and pre- and post-student 
assessment as a means of obtaining meaningful data for curricular improvement. Data may be 
utilized for facilities improvement, equipment investments, mission success, and professional 
development.  
(h) The office shall engage in statewide data sharing agreements with credential providers 
that include a variety of access portals for a variety of levels of personnel, including but not 
limited to state, local career technical education administration, career technical education 
teachers, parents, and students, giving access to stakeholders to assess program effectiveness.  
(i) The office shall encourage and work to increase the use of articulation agreements 
with community colleges and public universities and other dual credit programs to allow career 
technical education students to earn credit and stacked credentials that lead to an associate’s 
degree.  

of 5 51  (j) The office shall implement and promote efforts, including those related to student 
outreach and retention, to ensure that career technical education programs are accessible to all 
students, including English language learners, students with disabilities, and student populations 
traditionally underrepresented in career technical education programs. 
Section 41. The office shall work with the Regional Workforce Boards on an annual basis 
to determine the labor market needs in their region and, using that information, shall actively 
promote and facilitate the introduction of career technical education programs that align with 
regional demand. The office shall work with the regional workforce boards to assure curricular 
alignment to both local employers’ need and expected national standards for labor market needs.  
Section 42. Any comprehensive high school shall have access to a minimum of 1 career 
technical education course or an approved career technical education internship to increase all 
students’ exposure to career technical education fields, enabling students to have the knowledge 
to access both college and careers.  
SECTION 2. Section 3A of Chapter 70B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the number “17” and inserting “19” in place 
thereof, and further by inserting, after “Fire Chiefs' Association of Massachusetts, Inc.” the 
following:- 
“, Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc., Alliance for Vocational 
Technical Education Coalition,”  
SECTION 3. Subsection (c) of section 14B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and inserting in place thereof the 
following 2 sentences:-  

of 5 73  “Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a city or town may 
simultaneously be a member of a vocational regional school district and any other type of 
regional school district. A city or town that belongs to a regional vocational school district may 
offer a vocational technical education program in its municipal high school; provided, however, 
that the program is approved under section 2 of chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided, 
further, that a vocational regional school district and any other type of regional school district 
serving the same town shall collaborate through the office of career technical education in 
offering reciprocal non-competitive programs under chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided, 
further, that said programs meet the labor market needs in a community’s region as determined 
by Regional Workforce Boards.” 
SECTION 4. Subsection (q) of section 16 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the word “five” and inserting in place thereof the 
number “25”. 
SECTION 5. The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish and 
administer a pilot program to incentivize collaboration between high school faculty and guidance 
counselors of schools offering chapter 74 programs and those that do not to utilize resources 
developed by career technical education to provide access to skill-training and career options for 
all students. The pilot program shall be administered for 2 years from the date the program is 
initiated. At the end of said 2-year period, the department shall submit a report on the effects of 
the program and the feasibility of continuing such program to the clerks of the house of 
representatives and the senate, and to the house and senate co-chairs of the joint committee on 
education.